Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-925
Violations; orders authorized; administrative fine; lien; failure to pay; separate violation.

(1) If the director finds, after notice and hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has violated the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the director thereunder, the director may order such person to pay (a) an administrative fine of not more than five thousand dollars for each separate violation and (b) the costs of investigation.

(2) If any person is found to have violated subdivision (1)(e), (1)(f), or (1)(g) of section 45-919, the director may also order such person to (a) return to the maker or makers all fees collected plus all or part of the amount of the check or checks which the licensee accepted in violation of such subdivision or subdivisions and (b) for a period up to one year not engage in any delayed deposit transaction with any maker for at least three days after the completion of a delayed deposit transaction with the same maker. If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of investigation ordered pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a lien in the amount of such fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and property of such person in this state and may be recovered in a civil action by the director. Failure of the person to pay such fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the act.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 25;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 46.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.